Utah statutes.
10-2-426.   Division of municipal-type services revenues.
(1)  The legislative body of each county of the first class in which an area
proposed for annexation under this part is located shall, until the date of
annexation, continue:
(a)  to levy and collect ad valorem property tax and other revenues from or
pertaining to the area; and
(b)  except as otherwise agreed by the county legislative body and the
municipal legislative body, to provide the same services to the area proposed
for annexation as the county provided before the commencement of the
annexation proceedings.
(2) (a)  The legislative body of each county of the first class in which an
area proposed for annexation is located shall, after annexation, share pro
rata with the annexing municipality the taxes and service charges or fees
levied and collected by the county under Section 17-34-3 during the year of
the annexation if and to the extent that the annexing municipality provides,
by itself or by contract, the same services for which the county levied and
collected the taxes and service charges or fees.
(b)  The pro rata allocation of taxes under Subsection (2)(a) shall be based
on the date of annexation, and the pro rata allocation of service charges and
fees shall be based on the proportion of services related to the service
charges and fees that remain to be rendered after annexation.
